inc/flattened/phonology-only-prefix-and-postboundary-rules.xfscript
!these handle contemptive/diminutive allomorphy
!define lenPreNas [ e1 -> e || _ nastrig];
define lenPreNas [e1 -> e || _  nastrig,,
                    [..] -> o || \o o _ nastrig ,,
                    [..] -> i || \i i _ nastrig ,,
                    [..] -> a || \a a _ nastrig ];

define Ei [e1 -> i];

!devoicing, final lowering is written by non-Rhodes spelling (i->e not standard)
define devoice [b -> p, d -> t, g -> k || _ .#.];
define finlowo  [o  ->  a || _ .#.];  ! SNM: had to split the rule in two - it
define finlowi  [i (->) e || _ .#.];  ! is not possible to combine -> and (->) in the same rule the way it was.

define str1 [ [..] -> %& || vowel _ vowel, vowel vowel _, e _ ];
define str2 [ [..] -> %& || shortv _ (codaseqs) [%-|.#.] ];
define str3 [ [..] -> %& // shortv cseqs shortv _ ];

define ambigsync [vowel -> %' || !syncope in ortho ambig contexts
                                \[.#.|%-] n _  [z|g|h|s|y], !material preceding n reflects a permitted ambiguity
                                                            !for derived nh, ' not always used (mzinhigan perhaps preceding V must be long?)
                                [s|z] _  [h]
                                ];

define clustsync [vowel -> %' || !crazy version (marking all prim/sec ambig clusts)
                                n _  [d|z h|z|j|g|h|s|y],
                                m _  [b],
                                [s|z] _  [h],
                                [s (h)] _  [p|t|k],
                                cons-[w|y|w1|w2|w3|w4|y1|%'|h] _  w
                                ];

define rsync [vowel -> 0 || _ \%& ]; 

define codawdel [w (->) 0 || _ cons ]; !w variably deletes in coda Medler
                                        !alternatively: the deleting w (VAI 3 suff) is irregularly present

define cleanse [ [%>|%^|%<|%&|%*] -> 0 ]; !> = suff bound, < pre bound, ^ v-init dep stem marker, & stress marker, *extended prefix boundary
define rmStressMarker [ %& -> 0 ] ;

! read lexc /Users/arppe/giellatekno/langs/otw/src/morphology/lexicon.tmp.lexc
! define Morphology ;

read regex [ ! Morphology.l .o.
    rmvalent    .o. !valentine special char killer ! This is needed for the stems and prefixes
    preGli      .o.
!    optinitV    .o. !allows post syncope n-nokii < n[d]-ankii < nidanokii. Comment out for syncope/non-syncope
    preDel      .o.
    preLen      .o.
    preEpen     .o. 
!    conPl       .o.
!    a1toshort   .o.
!    a1toe       .o.
!    a1tolong    .o.
!    i1tolong    .o.
!    ordAssim    .o.
!    NC          .o.
!    cnjD1Gnasstem .o.
!    partexcise  .o.
!    cnjD1p      .o.
!    cnjpb1      .o.
!    cnjnegsig   .o.
!    cnjd1w4     .o.
!    cnjoban     .o.
!    cnjW3w      .o.
!    cnjW3del    .o.
!    cnjrmbound  .o.
!    cnjaepen    .o.
!    w5o         .o.
!    w5del       .o.
!    w5w         .o.
!    ccEpen      .o.
    rmBound     .o. !rules at or above this line reference morpheme boundaries
    ccnjexcrspec .o.
    ccnjlong    .o.
    ccnjshort   .o.
    ccnjexcr    .o.
    rmccnj      .o.
    cnjHiatus   .o.
    cnjVoi      .o.
    d2k         .o.
    d2del       .o.
    d2d         .o.
    cnjRmC1     .o.
    cnjD1Gnas   .o.
    d1pal       .o.
    cnjD1d      .o.
    cnjW4nas    .o. !Medler didn't have this rule
    cnjW4w      .o.
    cnjw4Del    .o.
    cnjb1b      .o.
    vtiVoi      .o.
    complen     .o.
    m1n         .o.
    n4n         .o.
    m1m         .o.
    w2nas       .o.
    w2def       .o.
    Spal        .o.
    Salv        .o.
    Npal        .o.
    i2def     .o.
    Nalv        .o.
    ny          .o.
    vvvDel      .o.
    y1Coal      .o.
    w1Coal      .o.
    w1Coal2     .o. ! only Odawa
    !w1Faith     .o. ! other dialects
    w1Del       .o.
    wiCoal      .o. !Might should include this rule (Medler, might be more general)
    vCoal       .o.
    lenPreNas   .o.
    Ei          .o.
    apocope     .o.
    glidedel    .o.
    n2del       .o.
    n2def       ! .o.
!    str1        .o.
!    str2        .o.
!    str3        .o.
!     ambigsync   .o. !comment out for non-syncopated
!     rsync       .o. !comment out for non-syncopated
!     codawdel    .o. !Medler, probably more general
! cleanse     
! rmStressMarker
]; 
